North Dakota, session 69, SB2030.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - HOUSING FINANCE AGENCY - GENERAL FUND -
HOMELESS GRANTS. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state
treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $10,000,000, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, to the housing finance agency for the purpose of providing homeless grants, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - HOUSING FINANCE AGENCY - GENERAL FUND -
HOMELESSNESS STUDY - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any moneys in
the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $50,000, or so
much of the sum as may be necessary, to the housing finance agency for the purpose of
contracting a consultant to assist with a study of homelessness in the state, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. This appropriation is considered a one-time
funding item.
SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION - GENERAL
FUND - HOMELESSNESS LIAISON SERVICES - MATCHING FUNDS. There is appropriated
out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum
of $1,000,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the department of public
instruction for the purpose of providing grants for homelessness liaison services to the ten
school districts in the state with the greatest student enrollment, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. A school district may receive no more than $50,000 per
fiscal year under this program and it must provide $1 of matching funds for every $1 received
from the state for homelessness liaison services.
Page No. 1 25.0377.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - TRANSFER - HOUSING INCENTIVE FUND - ONE-TIME
FUNDING - LEGISLATIVE INTENT. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general
fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $200,000,000, which the office
of management and budget shall transfer to the housing incentive fund during the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. It is the intent of the legislative assembly
that this funding be distributed from the housing incentive fund over the four-year period
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2029. This appropriation is considered a one-time
funding item.
SECTION 5. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - HOMELESSNESS. During the
2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall study homelessness in the state. The study
must include a review of data and funding available to address homelessness, an analysis of
the use of available funds to identify gaps and potential solutions, and input from a consultant
engaged by the housing finance agency to assist the committee with the study. The legislative
management shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any legislation
required to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.
Page No. 2 25.0377.03000